Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8268.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-7.4-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.4 entitled "The
Healthcare Services Funding Plan Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.4-3. Imposition of healthcare services funding contribution.
(a) Each insurer is required to pay the healthcare services funding contribution for each
contribution enrollee of the insurer at the time the contribution is calculated and paid, at the rate set
forth in this section.
(1) Beginning January 1, 2016, the secretary shall set the healthcare services funding
contribution each fiscal year in an amount equal to: (i) The child immunization funding requirement
described in § 23-1-46; plus (ii) The adult immunization funding requirement described in § 23-1-
46; plus (iii) The children’s health services funding requirement described in § 42-12-29; and all
as divided by (iv) The number of contribution enrollees of all insurers.
(2) The contribution set forth herein shall be in addition to any other fees or assessments
upon the insurer allowable by law.
(b) The contribution shall be paid by the insurer; provided, however, a person providing
health benefits coverage on a self-insurance basis that uses the services of a third-party
administrator shall not be required to make a contribution for a contribution enrollee where the
contribution on that enrollee has been or will be made by the third-party administrator.
(c) Beginning calendar year 2026, in addition to the assessment collection pursuant to

subsection (a), there shall be an additional amount assessed pursuant to (i) and (ii), to support
primary care and other critical healthcare programs, including both the MomsPRN and PediPRN
teleconsultation lines, as described in § 23-1-46.1, totaling thirty million dollars ($30,000,000),
which shall be deposited as general revenues.
SECTION 2. Section 23-1-46.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1 entitled "Department
of Health" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1-46.1. Psychiatry resource network account Psychiatry resource network
programs. [See Compiler’s Note.]
(a) There is created within the general fund a restricted receipt account to be known as the
“PRN account.” All money in the account shall be utilized by the The department of health shall
manage any and all funds available to effectuate coverage for the following services: Existing
Rhode Island lines including the PediPRN and MomsPRN teleconsultation information lines
together with any additional information line, referral service, or hotline which is are available to
support pediatric, primary care, perinatal, and other service providers or residents in the state in
providing appropriate and timely mental healthcare and referrals to children, perinatal patients, and
mothers with mental health concerns., and which is funded pursuant to regulation adopted by the
director of the department of health. Amounts collected pursuant to § 42-7.4-3(a)(1)(iv) shall be
deposited in the “PRN account.” The funds shall be used solely for the purposes of the “PRN
account,” and no other.
(b) Each year’s psychiatry resource network funding requirement in § 42-7.4-3(a)(1)(iv)
shall be the amount:
(1) Projected by the department of health for the services in subsection (a) of this section;
plus
(2) A ten percent (10%) contingency for unexpected expenses; and after
(3) Deduction for any projected carryover of excess funds from prior assessments.
(c) The department of health shall submit to the general assembly an annual report on the
program and costs related to the program, on or before February 1 of each year. The department
shall make available to each insurer required to make a contribution pursuant to § 42-7.4-3, upon
its request, detailed information regarding the programs described in subsection (a) of this section
and the costs related to those programs.
(d)(b) The “PRN account program” shall be exempt from the indirect costs recovery
provisions of § 35-4-27.
SECTION 3. Chapter 23-13 of the General Laws entitled "Maternal and Child Health
Services for Children with Special Health Care Needs" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
LC006051 - Page 2 of 4

following section:
23-13-27. Psychiatry resource network programs.
(a) Subject to appropriation, with sources including, but not limited to, § 42-7.4-3, the
department shall operate statewide the psychiatry resource network programs: PediPRN and
MomsPRN. These statewide psychiatry resource network programs expand Rhode Island's
behavioral health and substance use capacity by providing workforce development and psychiatric
consultation to primary and specialty care providers, including community-based health
professionals.
(b) The “PRN program” shall be exempt from the indirect costs recovery provisions of §
35-4-27.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006051
========
LC006051 - Page 3 of 4